Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-149
District treasurer; reports to district board; contents; warrants; register; order of payment.

The district treasurer shall also report to the board in writing, on the first Monday of each month the amount of money in the district treasury, the amount of receipts for the month preceding and the amount of items and expenditures, and such report shall be verified and filed with the secretary of the board. The district treasurer shall keep a register in which he shall enter each warrant presented for payment showing the date and amount of such warrant, to whom payable, the date of the presentation for payment, the date of payment, and the amount paid in redemption thereof, and all warrants shall be paid in the order of their presentation for payment to the district treasurer.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 23, p. 286;

Laws 1897, c. 86, § 6, p. 364;

R.S.1913, § 3481;

Laws 1917, c. 84, § 1, p. 198;

C.S.1922, § 2881;

Laws 1923, c. 97, § 3, p. 251;

Laws 1929, c. 131, § 1, p. 483;

C.S.1929, § 46-126;

R.S.1943, § 46-149.